Washington statutes.
RCW 43.340.020

Tobacco settlement authority—Governing board—Meetings—Staff support.

(1) The tobacco settlement authority is created and constitutes a public instrumentality and agency of the state, separate and distinct from the state, exercising public and essential governmental functions. The authority is a public body within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.

(2) The powers of the authority are vested in and shall be exercised by a board consisting of five directors appointed by the governor, one of whom shall be appointed by the governor as chair of the authority and who shall serve on the authority and as chair of the authority at the pleasure of the governor. The governor shall make the initial appointments no later than thirty days after April 4, 2002. The term of the directors, other than the chair, shall be four years from the date of their appointment, except that the terms of two of the initial appointees, as determined by the governor, shall be for two years from the date of their appointment. A director may be removed by the governor for cause under RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080. The governor shall fill any vacancy on the board by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. The members of the authority shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and may be reimbursed, solely from the funds of the authority, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter, subject to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) Three members of the board constitute a quorum.

(4) The members shall elect a treasurer and secretary annually, and other officers as the members determine necessary.

(5) Meetings of the board shall be held in accordance with the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, and at the call of the chair or when a majority of the members so requests. Meetings of the board may be held at any location within or out of the state, and members of the board may participate in a meeting of the board by means of a conference telephone or similar communication equipment under RCW 23B.08.200.

(6) The staff of the state housing finance commission under chapter 43.180 RCW shall provide administrative and staff support to the authority and shall be compensated for its services solely from the funds of the authority.

[ 2002 c 365 s 3.]